Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.282

Evergreen jobs training account—Grants.

The evergreen jobs training account is created in the state treasury. Funds deposited to the account may include gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources, in trust or otherwise. Moneys from the account must be used to supplement the state opportunity grant program established under RCW 28B.50.271. All receipts from appropriations directed to the account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the activities identified in this section. The state board, in consultation with the department and the *leadership team, may authorize expenditures from the account but must distribute grants from the account on a competitive basis. Grant funds from the evergreen jobs training account should be used when other public or private funds are insufficient or unavailable.

(1) These grant funds may be used for, but are not limited to uses for:

(a) Curriculum development;

(b) Transitional jobs strategies for dislocated workers in declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage occupations in green industries;

(c) Workforce education to target populations;

(d) Adult basic and remedial education as necessary linked to occupation skills training; and

(e) Coordinated outreach efforts by institutions of higher education and workforce development councils.

(2) These grant funds may not be used for student assistance and support services available through the state opportunity grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.

(3) Applicants eligible to receive these grants may be any organization or a partnership of organizations that has demonstrated expertise in:

(a) Implementing effective education and training programs that meet industry demand; and

(b) Recruiting and supporting, to successful completion of those training programs carried out under these grants, the target populations of workers.

(4) In awarding grants from the evergreen jobs training account, the state board shall give priority to applicants that demonstrate the ability to:

(a) Use labor market and industry analysis developed by the employment security department and green industry skill panels in the design and delivery of the relevant education and training program, and otherwise use strategies developed by green industry skill panels;

(b) Leverage and align existing public programs and resources and private resources toward the goal of recruiting, supporting, educating, and training target populations of workers;

(c) Work collaboratively with other relevant stakeholders in the regional economy;

(d) Link adult basic and remedial education, where necessary, with occupation skills training;

(e) Involve employers and, where applicable, labor unions in the determination of relevant skills and competencies and, where relevant, the validation of career pathways; and

(f) Ensure that supportive services, where necessary, are integrated with education and training and are delivered by organizations with direct access to and experience with the targeted population of workers.

[ 2009 c 536 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The leadership team was created in 2009 c 536 s 3, which was vetoed.

Short title—2009 c 536: See note following RCW 43.330.370.